Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,148
School of cosmetology; exempt.

A licensed school of cosmetology is not required to be licensed as a nail technology school in order to provide a nail technology program.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 68;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,219;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 410.